Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-2213.02
Person, defined.

Person means an individual or a firm, a partnership, a limited partnership, a limited liability company, an association, a corporation, or any other group engaged in joint business activities, however organized.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 27.